Illinois, session 104th, SB2109.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 5Section 16-1 as follows: 6    (755 ILCS 5/16-1)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 16-1)7    Sec. 16-1. Citation on behalf of estate.8    (a) Upon the filing of a petition therefor by the 9representative or by any other person interested in the estate 10or, in the case of an estate of a ward by any other person, the 11court shall order a citation to issue for the appearance 12before it of any person whom the petitioner believes (1) to 13have concealed, converted or embezzled or to have in his 14possession or control any personal property, books of account, 15papers or evidences of debt or title to lands which belonged to 16a person whose estate is being administered in that court or 17which belongs to his estate or to his representative or (2) to 18have information or knowledge withheld by the respondent from 19the representative and needed by the representative for the 20recovery of any property by suit or otherwise. The petition 21shall contain a request for the relief sought.22    (a-5) Upon the filing of a petition by a representative of 23a ward, the court shall order a citation to issue for the   SB2109- 2 -LRB104 11232 JRC 21314 b1appearance before it of any person or agent of a financial 2institution that the petitioner believes to have improperly 3withheld or concealed the assets of a person with a 4disability. The petition must contain a request for the relief 5sought. It is improper for a financial institution to fail to 6comply with a representative's directions regarding the 7collection, transfer, distribution, or delivery of the assets 8of a person with a disability upon presentation of the 9representative's letters of office or a court order directing 10the collection, transfer, distribution, or delivery of the 11assets of a person with a disability. 12    (b) The citation must be served not less than 10 days 13before the return day designated in the citation and must be 14served and returned in the manner provided for summons in 15civil cases. If there is a personal representative who is not 16the respondent, notice of the proceeding shall be given by 17mail or in person to the personal representative not less than 185 days before the return day designated in the citation.19    (c) If the representative is the respondent, the court may 20appoint a special administrator to represent the estate. The 21court may permit the special administrator to prosecute or 22defend an appeal.23    (d) The court may examine the respondent on oath whether 24or not the petitioner has proved the matters alleged in the 25petition, may hear the evidence offered by any party, may 26determine all questions of title, claims of adverse title and   SB2109- 3 -LRB104 11232 JRC 21314 b1the right of property and may enter such orders and judgment as 2the case requires. If the respondent refuses to answer proper 3questions put to him or refuses to obey the court's order to 4deliver any personal property or, if converted, its proceeds 5or value, or books of account, papers or evidences of debt or 6title to lands, the court may commit him to jail until he 7complies with the order of the court or is discharged by due 8course of law and the court may enforce its order against the 9respondent's real and personal property in the manner in which 10judgments for the payment of money are enforced. The court may 11tax the costs of the proceeding against the respondent and 12enter judgment therefor against him.13(Source: P.A. 99-93, eff. 1-1-16; 99-497, eff. 1-29-16.)